Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5052.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-24-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-24 entitled "Rhode
Island Veterans’ Home" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-24-10. Admissible to home — Fees.
(a)(1) Any person who has served in the army, navy, marine corps, coast guard, or air force,
or space force of the United States for a period of ninety (90) days or more and that period began
or ended during any foreign war in which the United States shall have been engaged or in any
expedition or campaign for which the United States government issues a campaign medal, and who
was honorably discharged from it not less than two (2) years, and whose service was honorably
discharged, any veteran of any conflict or undeclared war who has earned a campaign ribbon or
expeditionary medal for service in either a declared or undeclared war as noted on the veteran's
DD-214, and any person who is honorably discharged after completion of at least twenty (20) years
of service in the Rhode Island National Guard or a reserve component, and who shall be deemed
to be in need of care provided at the Rhode Island veterans’ home, may be admitted to that facility
subject to such rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the director of human services the office
of veterans services to govern the admission of applicants to the facility. Any person who has served
in the armed forces of the United States designated herein and otherwise qualified, who has served
less than the ninety-day (90) two (2) year period described in this section, and who was honorably
discharged from service, and who, as a result of the service, acquired a service-connected disability

or disease, may be admitted. For the purpose of computing services under this section, honorable
service in the active forces or reserves shall be considered towards the twenty (20) years. No person
shall be admitted to the facility unless the person has been accredited to the enlistment or induction
quota of the state or has resided in the state for at least two (2) consecutive years next prior to the
date of the application for admission to the facility.
(2) One year after passage of this subsection, war veterans, defined as any veteran of any
conflict or undeclared war who has earned a campaign ribbon, or expeditionary medal for service
in either a declared or undeclared war as noted on the veteran’s DD-214, shall be given priority for
admission above all other eligible veterans. To the extent that there are veterans unsuccessfully
claiming to be war veterans under the definition herein due to the undocumented nature of their
service, the director of the office of veterans services is granted the authority to waive the within
requirements only if the veteran provides that office with clear and convincing evidence that he or
she was a combat veteran. The director shall maintain two (2) separate waiting lists, one for war
veterans and one for non-war veterans. No non-war veteran may be admitted until the waiting list
of war veterans is depleted. Veterans on the waiting list on the effective date of this subsection shall
remain eligible for admission.
(b)(1) The director shall, at the end of each fiscal year, determine the net, per-diem
expenses of maintenance of residents in the facility and shall assess against each resident who has
“net income”, as defined in this section, a fee equal to eighty percent (80%) of the resident’s net
income, provided that fee shall not exceed the actual cost of care and maintenance for the resident;
and provided that an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the maintenance fee assessed shall
be allocated to, and deposited in, the veterans’ restricted account. For the purposes of this section,
“net income” is defined as gross income minus applicable federal and state taxes and minus:
(i) An amount equal to one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month of residency and fifty
percent (50%) of any sum received due to wounds incurred under battle conditions for which the
resident received the purple heart; and
(ii) The amount paid by a resident for the support and maintenance of his or her spouse,
parent(s), minor child(ren), or child(ren) who is/are blind or permanently and totally disabled as
defined in title XVI of the Federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1381 — 1383d, subject to a
maximum amount to be determined by rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the director.
(2) The fees shall be paid monthly to the home and any failure to make payment when due
shall be cause for dismissal from the facility. Prior to dismissal, the resident shall be afforded
administrative due process.
(c) Admissions to the veterans’ home shall be made without discrimination as to race,
LC000044 - Page 2 of 4

color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, marital status, age, sexual orientation, gender identity
or expression, assets, or income.
(d) Laundry services shall be provided to the residents of the Rhode Island veterans’ home
at no charge to the residents, with such funds to cover the cost of providing laundry services for
residents of the Rhode Island veterans’ home derived from monies appropriated to the department
of human services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000044
========
LC000044 - Page 3 of 4